Utah statutes.
34A-2-208.   Right to compensation when employer fails to comply.
(1)  Any employee, or the employee's dependents if death has ensued, may, in
lieu of proceeding against the employee's employer by civil action in the
courts as provided in Section 34A-2-207, file an application with the Division
of Adjudication for compensation in accordance with this chapter or Chapter 3,
Utah Occupational Disease Act, when:
(a)  the employee's employer failed to comply with Section 34A-2-201;
(b)  the employee has been injured by accident arising out of or in the course
of the employee's employment, wherever the injury occurred; and
(c)  the injury described in Subsection (1)(b) was not purposely self-
inflicted.
(2) An application for compensation filed under Subsection (1) shall be
treated by the commission, including for purposes of appeal to the
commissioner or Appeals Board, as an application for hearing under Section
34A-2-801.
(3)  (a)  If an application for compensation is filed under Subsection (1), in
accordance with Part 8, Adjudication, the commission shall determine the award
due to:
(i)  the injured employee; or
(ii)  the employee's dependents in case death has ensued.
(b)  The employer shall pay the award determined under Subsection (3)(a) to
the persons entitled to the compensation within ten days after receiving
notice from the commission of the amount of the award determined under
Subsection (3)(a).
